Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB206.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "claimant" means a person convicted and subsequently
imprisoned for one (1) or more crimes that the person did not commit.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a claimant may bring an action in
the Circuit Court of the county in which the conviction occurred seeking
damages from the Commonwealth pursuant to this section.
(3) (a) In an action under this section, the claimant shall establish each of the
following by a preponderance of the evidence:
1. The claimant was convicted of a felony crime in the Commonwealth
and subsequently imprisoned in the Commonwealth;
2. a. The claimant's conviction was reversed or vacated, and either
the charges were dismissed or on retrial the court entered a
judgment of not guilty; or
b. The claimant was granted a pardon by the Governor; and
3. The claimant did not commit the crime for which the claimant was
convicted and was not an accessory or accomplice to the acts that were
the basis of the conviction.
(b) The court may give due consideration to difficulties of proof caused by
circumstances including but not limited to the passage of time, the death or
unavailability of witnesses, or the destruction of evidence.
(4) (a) An action filed under to this section shall be brought in accordance with the
Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure and within a period of two (2) years
after:
1. a. The claimant's conviction was reversed or vacated and the
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
criminal charges against the claimant were dismissed;
b. The court entered a judgment of not guilty on retrial; or
c. The appeals process has been exhausted;
whichever is later; or
2. The grant of a pardon to the claimant.
(b) An action filed under this section by a claimant who has been convicted,
imprisoned, and released from Department of Corrections custody before
the effective date of this Act shall be brought no later than two (2) years
after the effective date of this Act.
(c) An action filed under this section shall be served on the Attorney General
and the Commonwealth attorney in the county where the conviction
occurred in accordance with the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure.
(5) (a) Subject to any adjustment made under paragraph (e) of this subsection,
damages awarded under this section shall be equal to:
1. Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection:
a. Sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) for each year of
imprisonment; or
b. Seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for each year of
imprisonment if the claimant was imprisoned with a death
sentence; and
2. Thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($32,500) for each
additional year:
a. Served on parole or postincarceration supervision; or
b. The claimant was required to register as a sex offender under
KRS 17.510;
whichever is greater.
(b) Amounts awarded under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be:
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
1. Determined pro rata to the number of days the claimant spent
imprisoned or under supervision, or was required to register as a sex
offender under KRS 17.510; and
2. Issued as twenty-four (24) payments per year, to be made twice a
month, over a period of three (3) years.
(c) A claimant shall not receive compensation for any period of incarceration
that the claimant was concurrently serving under a sentence for a
conviction of another felony crime that the claimant committed.
(d) In addition to damages awarded pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the claimant:
1. Shall be entitled to receive reasonable attorney's fees and costs
incurred in the action brought under this section not to exceed a total
of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), unless a greater award is
authorized by the court upon a finding of good cause shown;
2. Shall be entitled to receive a tuition waiver for up to one hundred
twenty (120) credit hours, and waiver of any mandatory fees
associated with attendance, at any public postsecondary educational
institution in Kentucky;
3. Shall be entitled to reimbursement for all restitution, assessments,
fees, court costs, and all other sums paid by the claimant as required
by pretrial orders, judgment of conviction, or sentence in any
proceeding that gave rise to the conviction, reversal, vacation of the
conviction, or from retrial following a reversal;
4. Shall be entitled to compensation for any reasonable reintegrative
services and mental and physical health care costs incurred by the
claimant for the time period between his or her release from
incarceration and the entry of judgment under this section not to
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), unless a greater award
is authorized by the court upon a finding of good cause shown;
5. Shall be relieved of:
a. Child support payments owed by the claimant that became due,
and interest on child support arrearages that accrued, during the
time the claimant was incarcerated; and
b. Any payments owed by the claimant under any order issued
under KRS 403.211.
Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 413.090, the amounts owed
under subdivisions a. and b. of this subparagraph shall be awarded to
the party designated in the applicable order to receive payments;
6. Shall be entitled to reimbursement for housing costs incurred by the
claimant for the time period between his or her release from
incarceration and entry of judgment under this section; and
7. May be awarded other nonmonetary relief as sought in the complaint,
including but not limited to personal financial literacy assistance.
(e) 1. Beginning July 1, 2026, and every year thereafter, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall determine the percentage change in the
cost of living, based on the percent increase in the nonseasonally
adjusted annual average Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, U.S. City Average, All Items, between the two (2) most
recent calendar years available, as published by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics.
2. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall adjust the amounts
under paragraph (a) of this subsection for the following calendar year
by multiplying the amounts applicable to the calendar year that the
adjustment is made by the percentage amount determined under this
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
subsection. The adjustment shall not exceed three percent (3%) for
any year. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall round the
adjusted limitation amount to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100),
but the unrounded amount shall be used to calculate the adjustments
to the amounts in subsequent calendar years.
3. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall inform the
Administrative Office of the Courts of any adjustment made under this
paragraph as soon as practicable.
4. The adjusted amounts become effective on July 1 of the year in which
the adjustment is made, and apply to all claims filed under this section
on or after that date and before July 1 of the subsequent year.
(6) (a) If, at the time of entry of a judgment awarding damages under subsection
(5) of this section, the claimant has previously received a monetary award
against the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the
Commonwealth in another civil action related to the wrongful conviction, or
has entered into a settlement agreement with the Commonwealth or any
political subdivision of the Commonwealth related to the wrongful
conviction, the amount of the award in the previous civil action or the
amount received in settlement, less any sums paid to attorneys or for costs
in litigating the previous civil action or in obtaining the settlement, shall be
deducted from the sum of money that the claimant is entitled to receive
under this section. The court shall include in the judgment an offset to the
Commonwealth of any amount deducted pursuant to this subsection.
(b) If there has been no previous award or settlement under paragraph (a) of
this subsection and if, after the time of the entry of a judgment awarding
damages under subsection (5) of this section, the claimant receives a
monetary award against the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
the Commonwealth in a civil action related to the wrongful conviction, or
enters into a settlement agreement with the Commonwealth or any political
subdivision of the Commonwealth related to the wrongful conviction, the
claimant shall reimburse the Commonwealth for the sum of money paid
under subsection (5) of this section, less any sums paid to attorneys or for
costs in litigating the subsequent civil action or obtaining the settlement.
Any reimbursement required under this subsection shall not exceed the
amount of the monetary award the claimant receives for damages in the
civil action or the amount received in the settlement.
(7) If the court finds that the claimant is entitled to a judgment under subsection (5)
of this section, the court shall issue a certificate of innocence stating that the
claimant was innocent of all crimes of which the claimant was convicted. The
court shall send a certified copy of the certificate of innocence and the entry of
judgment to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet for payment
in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.
(8) Upon issuance of a certificate of innocence and motion by the claimant, the court
shall order the:
(a) Associated convictions and arrest records sealed and expunged from all
applicable state and federal systems regardless of whether the claimant has
prior criminal convictions; and
(b) Expungement and destruction of the associated biological samples
authorized by and given to the Department of Kentucky State Police in
accordance with KRS 17.175. Nothing in this subsection shall require the
Department of Kentucky State Police to expunge and destroy any samples or
profile records associated with the claimant that are related to any offense
other than the offense for which the court has issued a certificate of
innocence.
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 59
(9) Upon request by the claimant, the Department of Corrections shall provide
reentry services to a claimant that are provided to other persons, including but
not limited to financial assistance, housing assistance, mentoring, and
counseling. Services shall be provided while an action under this section is
pending and after any judgment is entered, as appropriate for the claimant.
(10) Upon entry of any final judgment in the Circuit Court in an action under this
section, the judgment may be appealed directly to the Kentucky Supreme Court.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency account to be
known as the wrongful conviction compensation fund. The fund shall consist of
moneys received from state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(2) The fund shall be administered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(3) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to compensate individuals who have
been wrongfully convicted and are entitled to compensation under Section 1 of
this Act and for no other purpose.
(4) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal year.
(5) In the event the amount in the wrongful conviction compensation fund is
insufficient to compensate eligible individuals who have been wrongfully
convicted and are entitled to compensation under Section 1 of this Act, the
unpaid claims shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be paid
from the general fund surplus account under KRS 48.700 or the budget reserve
trust fund account under KRS 48.705.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/9/2025 8:32 AM Jacketed